Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF63.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1071YH (3) 91 as/js H.F. 63 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 710.12 Human smuggling ââ 1 aggravated human smuggling. 2 1. a. A person commits the offense of human smuggling when 3 the person knowingly transports another person into the state, 4 or harbors or conceals another person within the state, and all 5 of the following apply: 6 (1) The person knows or should have known that the other 7 person is entering into or remaining in the United States 8 without proper documentation. 9 (2) The person benefits financially, or receives anything 10 of value. 11 (3) The person knows or should have known that the person 12 being smuggled is likely to be exploited for the financial gain 13 of another. 14 b. A person who commits the offense of human smuggling 15 commits a class âDâ felony. 16 2. a. Aggravated human smuggling is human smuggling for 17 which any of the following apply: 18 (1) The offense is committed using a dangerous weapon. 19 (2) The offense causes bodily harm, serious bodily harm, or 20 disfigurement to the person being smuggled. 21 (3) The offense causes the person being smuggled to become 22 a victim of sexual assault or sexual abuse, or involved in 23 commercial sexual activity as defined in section 710A.1. 24 b. A person who commits the offense of aggravated human 25 smuggling commits a class âBâ felony. 26